District of Columbia statutes.
9-315

Fern and Varnum Streets and Eastern Avenue Viaducts.

The viaducts and approaches thereto, to carry Fern and Varnum Streets over the tracks and right-of-way of the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad Company or the viaduct and approaches thereto to carry Eastern Avenue over the tracks and rights-of-way of the Philadelphia, Baltimore and Washington Railroad Company and the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad Company shall not be used by any street railroad company until said Companies shall have paid to the Collector of Taxes of the District of Columbia, a sum equal to one-fourth of the total cost of constructing said viaducts and approaches, to be applied to the credit of the District of Columbia. No limitation shall run against claims made by the District of Columbia under the provisions of this section.

History

Mar. 3, 1927, 44 Stat. 1352, ch. 306, § 1

Cross References

Pennsylvania Railroad Company, switch and siding connections, see § 9-1205.01 et seq.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 9-1205.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-515.
1973 Ed., § 7-515.

Editor's Notes

Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 9-310.